New York, session 2025-2026, S10369.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading and paragraph b of subdivision 6 of 2 section 804 of the education law, as amended by chapter 390 of the laws 3 of 2016, are amended to read as follows: 4 Health education regarding mental health, alcohol, drugs, tobacco 5 abuse [and], the prevention and detection of certain cancers, and 6 certain violence prevention. 7 b. (i) The commissioner shall make available an interpersonal violence 8 prevention education package for grades kindergarten through twelve, 9 which package may consist of student pamphlets, parent pamphlets, vide- 10 otapes and other informative materials to be distributed to school 11 districts, and shall encourage the use of such material as part of the 12 health or other related curricula or programs, provided, however, that 13 interpersonal violence prevention education is required for all health 14 education courses at the secondary high school level in order for a 15 student to graduate. 16 (ii) Within the interpersonal violence prevention education package 17 for all secondary high schools, the commissioner shall include instruc- 18 tion regarding certain violence prevention, including, but not limited 19 to, the legal and social consequences of disseminating sexually explicit 20 messages, imagery or video and cyberbullying as defined in subdivision 21 eight of section eleven of this chapter. Instruction shall also include 22 the education reform program established pursuant to section four 23 hundred fifty-eight-l of the social services law. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13505-01-5